Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 3. Additional State Retirement and Disability Benefits.
§ 25-11-112.
Additional annual payment to retirees and beneficiaries.

Any member who is receiving a retirement allowance for service or disability retirement, or any beneficiary thereof, who has received a monthly benefit for at least one (1) full fiscal year, shall be eligible to receive an additional benefit, on December 1 or July 1 of the year as provided in subsection (3) of this section, equal to an amount calculated under paragraph (a) or (b) below:

For any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2011, the sum of:

An amount equal to three percent (3%) of the annual retirement allowance multiplied by the number of full fiscal years in retirement before the end of the fiscal year in which the member reaches age fifty-five (55), plus

An additional amount equal to three percent (3%) compounded by the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age fifty-five (55), multiplied by the amount of the annual retirement allowance.

For any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, the sum of:

An amount equal to three percent (3%) of the annual retirement allowance multiplied by the number of full fiscal years in retirement before the end of the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60), plus

An additional amount equal to three percent (3%) compounded by the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60), multiplied by the amount of the annual retirement allowance.

The calculation of the beneficiary’s additional benefit under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be based on the member’s age and full fiscal years in retirement as if the member had lived.

The additional benefit provided for under this section shall be paid in one (1) payment in December of each year to those persons who are receiving a retirement allowance on December 1 of that year, unless an election is made under this subsection. However, if a retiree who is receiving a retirement allowance that will terminate upon the retiree’s death is receiving the additional benefit in one (1) payment and dies on or after July 1 but before December 1, the beneficiary designated on the retirement application, if any, shall receive in a single payment a fractional part of the additional benefit based on the number of months in which a retirement allowance was received during the fiscal year. Likewise, if a retiree is receiving a retirement allowance that will terminate upon his or her death in two (2) to six (6) monthly installments, any remaining payments of the additional benefit will be paid in a lump sum to the beneficiary designated on the application, or if none, pursuant to Section 25-11-117.1(1). Any similar remaining payments of additional benefits payable under this section to a deceased beneficiary who was receiving a monthly benefit shall be payable in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-11-117.1(2). If the additional monthly benefit is being received in one (1) payment, the additional benefit shall also be prorated based on the number of months in which a retirement allowance was received during the fiscal year when (i) the monthly benefit payable to a beneficiary terminates due to the expiration of an option, remarriage or cessation of dependent status or due to the retiree’s return to covered employment, and (ii) the monthly benefit terminates on or after July 1 and before December 1. The board may, in its discretion, allow a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in the manner provided for in this paragraph to change the manner in which the additional annual payment is received to that provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection if the retired member or beneficiary submits satisfactory documentation that the continued receipt of the additional annual payment as provided for in this paragraph will cause a financial hardship to the retired member or beneficiary.

Retired members or beneficiaries thereof who on July 1, 1999, or July 1 of any fiscal year thereafter, are receiving a retirement allowance, may elect by an irrevocable agreement in writing filed in the Office of the Public Employees’ Retirement System no less than thirty (30) days before July 1 of the appropriate year, to begin receiving the additional benefit provided for under this section in twelve (12) equal monthly installments beginning July 1, 1999, or July 1 of any fiscal year thereafter. This irrevocable agreement shall be binding on the member and subsequent beneficiaries. Payment of those monthly installments shall not extend beyond the month in which a retirement allowance is due and payable. The board may, in its discretion, allow a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in the manner provided for in this paragraph to change the manner in which the additional annual payment is received to that provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the retired member or beneficiary submits satisfactory documentation that the continued receipt of the additional annual payment as provided for in this paragraph will cause a financial hardship to the retired member or beneficiary.

The additional payment or payments provided for under this section are for the fiscal year in which they are paid.

The amount provided for under subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this section is calculated using the following formula:

[(1.03)n - 1] x [annual retirement allowance],

where n is the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age fifty-five (55).

The amount provided for under subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section is calculated using the following formula:

[(1.03)n - 1] x [annual retirement allowance],

where n is the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60).

Any retired member or beneficiary thereof who has previously elected to receive the additional annual payment in monthly installments may elect, upon application on a form prescribed by the board of trustees, to have that payment made in one (1) additional payment each year. This written election must be filed in the Office of the Public Employees’ Retirement System before June 1, 2000, and shall be effective for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2000.

In the event of death of a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in two (2) to six (6) monthly installments pursuant to an election made before July 1, 1999, and who would otherwise be eligible to receive the additional benefit provided for under this section in one (1) payment in December of the current fiscal year, any remaining amounts shall be paid in a lump sum to the designated beneficiary.

When a member retires after July 1 and has previously received a retirement allowance for one or more full fiscal years, the retired member shall be eligible immediately for the additional benefit. The additional benefit shall be based on the current retirement allowance and the number of full fiscal years in retirement and shall be prorated and paid in monthly installments based on the number of months a retirement allowance is paid during the fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 481, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 382; Laws, 1984, ch. 310; Laws, 1985, ch. 504, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 400, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 601, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 590, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 12; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 8; Laws, 2011, ch. 469, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 25-11-113.
Disability retirement.

Upon the application of a member or his employer, any active member in state service who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and who has at least four (4) years of membership service credit, or any active member in state service who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, who has at least eight (8) years of membership service credit, may be retired by the board of trustees on the first of the month following the date of filing the application on a disability retirement allowance, but in no event shall the disability retirement allowance begin before termination of state service, provided that the medical board, after an evaluation of medical evidence that may or may not include an actual physical examination by the medical board, certifies that the member is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty, that the incapacity is likely to be permanent, and that the member should be retired; however, the board of trustees may accept a disability medical determination from the Social Security Administration in lieu of a certification from the medical board. If a member who has been approved for a disability retirement allowance does not terminate state service within ninety (90) days after approval, the disability retirement and the application for disability retirement shall be void. For the purposes of disability determination, the medical board shall apply the following definition of disability: the inability to perform the usual duties of employment or the incapacity to perform such lesser duties, if any, as the employer, in its discretion, may assign without material reduction in compensation, or the incapacity to perform the duties of any employment covered by the Public Employees’ Retirement System (Section 25-11-101 et seq.) that is actually offered and is within the same general territorial work area, without material reduction in compensation. The employer shall be required to furnish the job description and duties of the member. The employer shall further certify whether the employer has offered the member other duties and has complied with the applicable provisions of the Americans With Disabilities Act in affording reasonable accommodations that would allow the employee to continue employment.

Any member applying for a disability retirement allowance must provide sufficient objective medical evidence in support of his or her claim. All disability determinations, whether the initial examination or reexamination, shall be based on objective medical evidence. “Objective medical evidence” means reports of examinations or treatments; medical signs that are anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that are observed and documented by medical professionals; psychiatric signs that are medically demonstrable phenomena indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory, orientation, or contact with reality; or laboratory findings that are anatomical, physiological, or psychological phenomena that are shown by medically acceptable laboratory diagnostic techniques, including, but not limited to, chemical tests, electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and psychological tests. Nonmedical information shall not be considered objective medical evidence.

Any inactive member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, with four (4) or more years of membership service credit, or any inactive member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, with eight (8) or more years of membership service credit, who has withdrawn from active state service, is not eligible for a disability retirement allowance unless the disability occurs within six (6) months of the termination of active service and unless satisfactory proof is presented to the board of trustees that the disability was the direct cause of withdrawal from state service. Application for a disability retirement allowance must be filed within one (1) year of termination from active service. This period may be extended by an additional year if it can be factually demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board of trustees that throughout the initial one-year period the member was incapable of applying for benefits by reason of mental or physical impairment as certified by a medical doctor.

Any member who is or becomes eligible for service retirement benefits under Section 25-11-111 while pursuing a disability retirement allowance under this section or Section 25-11-114 may elect to receive a service retirement allowance pending a final determination on eligibility for a disability retirement allowance or withdrawal of the application for the disability retirement allowance. In such a case, an application for a disability retirement allowance must be on file with the system before the beginning of a service retirement allowance. If the application is approved, the option selected and beneficiary designated on the retirement application shall be used to determine the disability retirement allowance. If the application is not approved or if the application is withdrawn, the service retirement allowance shall continue to be paid in accordance with the option selected. No person may apply for a disability retirement allowance after the person begins to receive a service retirement allowance.

If the medical board certifies that the member is not mentally or physically incapacitated for the future performance of duty, the member may request, within sixty (60) days, a hearing before the hearing officer as provided in Section 25-11-120. All hearings shall be held in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board to govern those hearings. The hearing may be closed upon the request of the member.

The medical board may request additional medical evidence and/or other physicians to conduct an evaluation of the member’s condition. If the medical board requests additional medical evidence and the member refuses the request, the application shall be considered void.

Allowance on disability retirement.

Upon retirement for disability, an eligible member shall receive a retirement allowance if he has attained the age of sixty (60) years.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2), an eligible member who is retired for disability and who has not attained sixty (60) years of age shall receive a disability benefit as computed in Section 25-11-111(d), which shall consist of:

A member’s annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his accumulated contributions at the time of retirement; and

An employer’s annuity equal to the amount that would have been payable as a retirement allowance for eligible creditable service if the member had continued in service to the age of sixty (60) years, which shall apply to the allowance for disability retirement paid to retirees receiving such allowance upon and after April 12, 1977. This employer’s annuity shall be computed on the basis of the average “earned compensation” as defined in Section 25-11-103.

For persons who become members after June 30, 1992, and for active members on June 30, 1992, who elect benefits under this paragraph (c) instead of those provided under paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the disability allowance shall consist of two (2) parts: a temporary allowance and a deferred allowance.

The temporaryallowance shall equal the greater of (i) forty percent (40%) of averagecompensation at the time of disability, plus ten percent (10%) ofaverage compensation for each of the first two (2) dependent children,as defined in Sections 25-11-103 and 25-11-114, or (ii) the accruedbenefit based on actual service. It shall be payable for a periodof time based on the member’s age at disability, as follows:

Click to view

The deferredallowance shall begin when the temporary allowance ends and shallbe payable for life. The deferred allowance shall equal the greaterof (i) the allowance that would have been payable had the member continuedin service to the termination age of the temporary allowance, butno more than forty percent (40%) of average compensation, or (ii)the accrued benefit based on actual service at the time of disability.The deferred allowance as determined at the time of disability shallbe adjusted in accordance with Section 25-11-112 for theperiod during which the temporary annuity is payable. In no case shalla member receive less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) per month for eachyear of service and proportionately for each quarter year thereofreduced for the option selected.

The member may elect to receive the actuarial equivalent of the disability retirement allowance in a reduced allowance payable throughout life under any of the provisions of the options provided under Section 25-11-115.

If a disability retiree who has not selected an option under Section 25-11-115 dies before being repaid in disability benefits the sum of his total contributions, then his named beneficiary shall receive the difference in cash, which shall apply to all deceased disability retirees from and after January 1, 1953.

Reexamination of retirees retired on account of disability. Except as otherwise provided in this section, once each year during the first five (5) years following retirement of a member on a disability retirement allowance, and once in every period of three (3) years thereafter, the board of trustees may, and upon his application shall, require any disability retiree who has not yet attained the age of sixty (60) years or the termination age of the temporary allowance under subsection (2)(c) of this section to undergo a medical examination, the examination to be made at the place of residence of the retiree or other place mutually agreed upon by a physician or physicians designated by the board. The board, however, in its discretion, may authorize the medical board to establish reexamination schedules appropriate to the medical condition of individual disability retirees. If any disability retiree who has not yet attained the age of sixty (60) years or the termination age of the temporary allowance under subsection (2)(c) of this section refuses to submit to any medical examination provided in this section, his allowance may be discontinued until his withdrawal of that refusal; and if his refusal continues for one (1) year, all his rights to a disability benefit shall be revoked by the board of trustees.

If the medical board reports and certifies to the board of trustees, after a comparable job analysis or other similar study, that the disability retiree is engaged in, or is able to engage in, a gainful occupation paying more than the difference between his disability allowance, exclusive of cost-of-living adjustments, and the average compensation, and if the board of trustees concurs in the report, the disability benefit shall be reduced to an amount that, together with the amount earnable by him, equals the amount of his average compensation. If his earning capacity is later changed, the amount of the benefit may be further modified, provided that the revised benefit shall not exceed the amount originally granted. A retiree receiving a disability benefit who is restored to active service at a salary less than the average compensation shall not become a member of the retirement system.

If a disability retiree under the age of sixty (60) years or the termination age of the temporary allowance under subsection (2)(c) of this section is restored to active service at a compensation not less than his average compensation, his disability benefit shall end, he shall again become a member of the retirement system, and contributions shall be withheld and reported. Any such prior service certificate, on the basis of which his service was computed at the time of retirement, shall be restored to full force and effect. In addition, upon his later retirement he shall be credited with all creditable service as a member, but the total retirement allowance paid to the retired member in his previous retirement shall be deducted from his retirement reserve and taken into consideration in recalculating the retirement allowance under a new option selected.

If following reexamination in accordance with the provisions contained in this section, the medical board determines that a retiree retired on account of disability is physically and mentally able to return to the employment from which he is retired, the board of trustees, upon certification of those findings from the medical board, shall, after a reasonable period of time, terminate the disability allowance, whether or not the retiree is reemployed or seeks that reemployment. In addition, if the board of trustees determines that the retiree is no longer sustaining a loss of income as established by documented evidence of the retiree’s earned income, the eligibility for a disability allowance shall terminate and the allowance terminated within a reasonable period of time. If the retirement allowance is terminated under the provisions of this section, the retiree may later qualify for a retirement allowance under Section 25-11-111 based on actual years of service credit plus credit for the period during which a disability allowance was paid.

Any current member as of June 30, 1992, who retires on a disability retirement allowance after June 30, 1992, and who has not elected to receive benefits under subsection (2)(c) of this section, shall relinquish all rights under the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, as amended, with regard to the benefits payable under this section.

Age at Disability Duration 60 and earlier to age 65 61 to age 66 62 to age 66 63 to age 67 64 to age 67 65 to age 68 66 to age 68 67 to age 69 68 to age 70 69 and over one year

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-16; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 16; Laws, 1968, ch. 578, § 3; Laws, 1977, ch. 450, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 382, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 5; Laws, 1992, ch. 576, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 617, § 5, 1995, ch. 627, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 472, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 9; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 469, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-11-114.
Retirement allowance for death before retirement or death or disability in line of duty.

The applicable benefits provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be paid to eligible beneficiaries of any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and has completed four (4) or more years of membership service, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, and has completed eight (8) or more years of membership service, and who dies before retirement and who has not filed a Pre-Retirement Optional Retirement Form as provided in Section 25-11-111.

The surviving spouse of a member who dies before retirement shall receive a monthly benefit computed in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subsection (2) as if the member had nominated his spouse as beneficiary if:

The member completed the requisite minimum number of years of membership service to qualify for a retirement allowance at age sixty (60);

The spouse has been married to the member for not less than one (1) year preceding the death of the member;

The member has not exercised any other option.

If, at the time of the member’s death, there are no dependent children, and the surviving spouse, who otherwise would receive the annuity under this subsection (2), has filed with the system a signed written waiver of his or her rights to the annuity and that waiver was in effect at the time of the member’s death, a lump-sum distribution of the deceased member’s accumulated contributions shall be refunded in accordance with Section 25-11-117.

The spouse annuity shall begin on the first day of the month following the date of the member’s death, but in case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year.

The spouse of a member who is eligible to receive a monthly benefit under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall receive a benefit for life equal to the higher of the following:

The greater of twenty percent (20%) of the deceased member’s average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 at the time of death or Fifty Dollars ($50.00) monthly; or

Benefits calculated under Option 2 of Section 25-11-115. The method of calculating the retirement benefits shall be on the same basis as provided in Section 25-11-111(d) or (e), as applicable. However, if the member dies before being qualified for a full, unreduced retirement allowance, then the benefits shall be reduced by an actuarially determined percentage or factor based on the lesser of either the number of years of service credit or the number of years in age required to qualify for a full, unreduced retirement allowance in Section 25-11-111(d) or (e), as applicable.

The surviving spouse of a deceased member who previously received spouse retirement benefits under paragraph (d)(i) of this subsection from and after July 1, 1992, and whose benefits were terminated before July 1, 2004, because of remarriage, may again receive the retirement benefits authorized under paragraph (d)(i) of this subsection by making application with the board to reinstate those benefits. Any reinstatement of the benefits shall be prospective only and shall begin after the first of the month following the date of the application for reinstatement, but no earlier than July 1, 2004. From and after July 1, 2010, any spouse who chose Option 2 from and after July 1, 1992, but before July 1, 2004, where the benefit, although payable for life, was less than the benefit available under the calculation in paragraph (d)(i) of this subsection shall have his or her benefit increased to the amount which provides the greater benefit.

Subject to the maximum limitation provided in this paragraph, the member’s dependent children each shall receive an annuity of the greater of ten percent (10%) of the member’s average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 at the time of the death of the member or Fifty Dollars ($50.00) monthly; however, if there are more than three (3) dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an equal share of a total annuity equal to thirty percent (30%) of the member’s average compensation, provided that the total annuity shall not be less than One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) per month for all children.

A child shall be considered to be a dependent child until marriage, or the attainment of age nineteen (19), whichever comes first; however, this age limitation shall be extended beyond age nineteen (19), but in no event beyond the attainment of age twenty-three (23), as long as the child is a student regularly pursuing a full-time course of resident study or training in an accredited high school, trade school, technical or vocational institute, junior or community college, college, university or comparable recognized educational institution duly licensed by a state. A student child who is receiving a retirement allowance as of June 30, 2016, whose birthday falls during the school year (September 1 through June 30) is considered not to reach age twenty-three (23) until the July 1 following the actual twenty-third birthday. A full-time course of resident study or training means a day or evening noncorrespondence course that includes school attendance at the rate of at least thirty-six (36) weeks per academic year or other applicable period with a subject load sufficient, if successfully completed, to attain the educational or training objective within the period generally accepted as minimum for completion, by a full-time day student, of the academic or training program concerned. Any child who is physically or mentally incompetent, as adjudged by either a Mississippi court of competent jurisdiction or by the board, shall receive benefits for as long as the incompetency exists.

If there are more than three (3) dependent children, upon a child’s ceasing to be a dependent child, his annuity shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children.

Annuities payable under this subsection (3) shall begin the first day of the month following the date of the member’s death or in case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year. Those benefits may be paid to a surviving parent or the lawful custodian of a dependent child for the use and benefit of the child without the necessity of appointment as guardian.

Death benefits in the line of duty. Regardless of the number of years of the member’s creditable service, the spouse and/or the dependent children of an active member who is killed or dies as a direct result of a physical injury sustained from an accident or a traumatic event caused by external violence or physical force occurring in the line of performance of duty shall qualify, on approval of the board, for a retirement allowance on the first of the month following the date of death, but in the case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year. The spouse shall receive a retirement allowance for life equal to one-half (1/2) of the average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103. In addition to the retirement allowance for the spouse, or if there is no surviving spouse, the member’s dependent child shall receive a retirement allowance in the amount of one-fourth (1/4) of the member’s average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103; however, if there are two (2) or more dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an equal share of a total annuity equal to one-half (1/2) of the member’s average compensation. If there are more than two (2) dependent children, upon a child’s ceasing to be a dependent child, his annuity shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children. Those benefits shall cease to be paid for the support and maintenance of each child upon the child attaining the age of nineteen (19) years; however, the spouse shall continue to be eligible for the aforesaid retirement allowance. Those benefits may be paid to a surviving parent or lawful custodian of the children for the use and benefit of the children without the necessity of appointment as guardian. Any spouse who received spouse retirement benefits under this paragraph (a) from and after April 4, 1984, and whose benefits were terminated before July 1, 2004, because of remarriage, may again receive the retirement benefits authorized under this paragraph (a) by making application with the board to reinstate those benefits. Any reinstatement of the benefits shall be prospective only and shall begin after the first of the month following the date of the application for reinstatement, but not earlier than July 1, 2004.

A child shall be considered to be a dependent child until marriage, or the attainment of age nineteen (19), whichever comes first; however, this age limitation shall be extended beyond age nineteen (19), but in no event beyond the attainment of age twenty-three (23), as long as the child is a student regularly pursuing a full-time course of resident study or training in an accredited high school, trade school, technical or vocational institute, junior or community college, college, university or comparable recognized educational institution duly licensed by a state. A student child who is receiving a retirement allowance as of June 30, 2016, whose birthday falls during the school year (September 1 through June 30) is considered not to reach age twenty-three (23) until the July 1 following the actual twenty-third birthday. A full-time course of resident study or training means a day or evening noncorrespondence course that includes school attendance at the rate of at least thirty-six (36) weeks per academic year or other applicable period with a subject load sufficient, if successfully completed, to attain the educational or training objective within the period generally accepted as minimum for completion, by a full-time day student, of the academic or training program concerned. Any child who is physically or mentally incompetent, as adjudged by either a Mississippi court of competent jurisdiction or by the board, shall receive benefits for as long as the incompetency exists.

If all the annuities provided for in this section payable on account of the death of a member terminate before there has been paid an aggregate amount equal to the member’s accumulated contributions standing to the member’s credit in the annuity savings account at the time of the member’s death, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of annuity payments shall be paid to the person that the member has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board. If there is no designated beneficiary surviving at termination of benefits, the difference shall be payable under Section 25-11-117.1(1).

Regardless of the number of years of creditable service, upon the application of a member or employer, any active member who becomes disabled as a direct result of a physical injury sustained from an accident or traumatic event caused by external violence or physical force occurring in the line of performance of duty, provided that the medical board or other designated governmental agency after a medical examination certifies that the member is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty and the incapacity is likely to be permanent, may be retired by the board of trustees on the first of the month following the date of filing the application but in no event shall the retirement allowance begin before the termination of state service. If a member who has been approved for a retirement allowance under this subsection does not terminate state service within ninety (90) days after the approval, the retirement allowance and the application for the allowance shall be void. The retirement allowance shall equal the allowance on disability retirement as provided in Section 25-11-113 but shall not be less than fifty percent (50%) of average compensation. Line of duty disability benefits under this section shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-11-113(1)(b), (c), (d), (e) and (f), (3), (4), (5) and (6).

For purposes of determining death or disability benefits under this section, the following shall apply:

Death or permanent and total disability resulting from a cardiovascular, pulmonary or musculoskeletal condition that was not a direct result of a physical injury sustained from an accident or a traumatic event caused by external violence or physical force occurring in the performance of duty shall be deemed a natural death or an ordinary disability.

A mental disability based exclusively on employment duties occurring on an ongoing basis shall be deemed an ordinary disability.

If the deceased or disabled member has less than four (4) years of membership service, the average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 shall be the average of all annual earned compensation in state service for the purposes of benefits provided in this section.

In case of death or total and permanent disability under subsection (4) or subsection (6) of this section and before the board shall consider any application for a retirement allowance, the employer must certify to the board that the member’s death or disability was a direct result of an accident or a traumatic event occurring during and as a result of the performance of the regular and assigned duties of the employee and that the death or disability was not the result of the willful negligence of the employee.

The application for the retirement allowance must be filed within one (1) year after death of an active member who is killed in the line of performance of duty or dies as a direct result of an accident occurring in the line of performance of duty or traumatic event; but the board of trustees may consider an application for disability filed after the one-year period if it can be factually demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board of trustees that the disability is due to the accident and that the filing was not accomplished within the one-year period due to a delayed manifestation of the disability or to circumstances beyond the control of the member. However, in case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year only.

Notwithstanding any other section of this article and in lieu of any payments to a designated beneficiary for a refund of contributions under Section 25-11-117, the spouse and/or children shall be eligible for the benefits payable under this section, and the spouse may elect, for both the spouse and/or children, to receive benefits in accordance with either subsections (2) and (3) or subsection (4) of this section; otherwise, the contributions to the credit of the deceased member shall be refunded in accordance with Section 25-11-117.

Notwithstanding any other section of this article, a spouse who is entitled to receive a monthly benefit under either subsection (2) or (4) of this section and who is also the named beneficiary for a refund of accumulated contributions in the member’s annuity savings account, may, after the death of the member, elect to receive a refund of accumulated contributions in lieu of a monthly allowance, provided that there are no dependent children entitled to benefits under subsection (3) of this section.

If the member has previously received benefits from the system to which he was not entitled and has not repaid in full all amounts payable by him to the system, the annuity amounts otherwise provided by this section shall be withheld and used to effect repayment until the total of the withholdings repays in full all amounts payable by him to the system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 311; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 6; Laws, 1992, ch. 576, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 617, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 13; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 6; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 6; Laws, 2010, ch. 389, § 3; Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 469, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2016.